tr: Elektrikli çıkrık hız kontrol tipi: Uygulama kontrollü; Dijital düğmeler; Ayak pedalı; El kadranı/düğmesi; Kol/kaydırıcı; Yalnızca önceden ayarlanmış hızlar; Dokunmatik ekran; Değişken hız (sürekli); Diğer
sl-SI: Električni nadzor hitrosti vrtečega se kolesa: Upravljanje prek aplikacije; Digitalni gumbi; Nožni pedal; Ročna številčnica/gumb; Ročica/drsnik; Samo prednastavljene hitrosti; Zaslon na dotik; Spremenljiva hitrost (zvezna); Drugo
es: Tipo de control de velocidad de la rueca eléctrica: Controlado por app; Botones digitales; Pedal; Disco/perilla manual; Palanca/control deslizante; Solo velocidades preestablecidas; Pantalla táctil; Velocidad variable (continua); Otro
fr: Type de commande de vitesse du rouet électrique: Contrôlé par appli; Boutons numériques; Pédale; Cadran/bouton manuel; Levier/curseur; Vitesses préréglées uniquement; Écran tactile; Vitesse variable (continue); Autre
fi: Sähköisen rukin nopeuden säätötyyppi: Sovellusohjattu; Digitaaliset painikkeet; Jalkapoljin; Käsivalitsin/nuppi; Vipu/liukusäädin; Vain esiasetetut nopeudet; Kosketusnäyttö; Muuttuva nopeus (portaaton); Muu
el: Τύπος ελέγχου ταχύτητας ηλεκτρικού περιστρεφόμενου τροχού: Ελέγχεται μέσω εφαρμογής; Ψηφιακά κουμπιά; Πεντάλ ποδιού; Καντράν χειρός/διακόπτης; Μοχλός/ρυθμιστικό; Μόνο προκαθορισμένες ταχύτητες; Οθόνη αφής; Μεταβλητή ταχύτητα (συνεχής); Άλλο
hu: Elektromos forgókerék sebességszabályozó típusa: Alkalmazásvezérelt; Digitális gombok; Lábpedál; Kézi tárcsa/tekerő; Kar/csúszka; Csak előre beállított sebességek; Érintőképernyő; Fokozatmentesen változtatható sebesség; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ regulácie otáčok elektrického rotačného kolesa: Ovládané cez aplikáciu; Digitálne tlačidlá; Nožný pedál; Otočný ovládač/rukoväť; Páčka/posuvník; Iba prednastavené rýchlosti; Dotyková obrazovka; Variabilná rýchlosť (plynulá); Iné
bg-BG: Тип управление на скоростта при електрическо въртящо колело: Управление чрез приложение; Дигитални бутони; Крачен педал; Ръчен регулатор/копче; Лост/плъзгач; Само предварително зададени скорости; Сензорен екран; Променлива скорост (непрекъсната); Друго
de: Typ der Drehzahlregelung des elektrischen Spinnrads: App-gesteuert; Digitale Tasten; Fußpedal; Handrad/Drehknopf; Hebel/Schieberegler; Nur voreingestellte Geschwindigkeiten; Touchscreen; Variable Geschwindigkeit (stufenlos); Sonstige
it: Tipo di controllo della velocità del filatoio elettrico: Controllato tramite app; Pulsanti digitali; Pedale; Ghiera/manopola manuale; Leva/cursore; Solo velocità preimpostate; Touchscreen; Velocità variabile (continua); Altro
nb: Elektrisk hastighetskontroll av spinnehjul: App-styrt; Digitale knapper; Fotpedal; Håndhjul/knott; Spak/glidebryter; Kun forhåndsinnstilte hastigheter; Berøringsskjerm; Variabel hastighet (kontinuerlig); Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de controle de velocidade da roda de fiar elétrica: Controlado por app; Botões digitais; Pedal; Botão giratório/mostrador manual; Alavanca/controle deslizante; Apenas velocidades predefinidas; Tela sensível ao toque; Velocidade variável (contínua); Outro
da: Elektrisk spindehjuls hastighedskontroltype: App-styret; Digitale knapper; Fodpedal; Drejeknap; Håndtag/skyder; Kun forudindstillede hastigheder; Touchskærm; Variabel hastighed (kontinuerlig); Andet
ro-RO: Tip de control electric al vitezei roții de tors: Controlat prin aplicație; Butoane digitale; Pedală; Cadran/Buton rotativ manual; Pârghie/Glisor; Doar viteze prestabilite; Ecran tactil; Viteză variabilă (continuă); Altele
nl: Elektrisch spinnewiel snelheidsregeling type: App-gestuurd; Digitale knoppen; Voetpedaal; Draaiknop; Hendel/schuif; Alleen vooraf ingestelde snelheden; Touchscreen; Variabele snelheid (traploos); Overige
en: Electric spinning wheel speed control type: App-controlled; Digital buttons; Foot pedal; Hand dial/knob; Lever/slider; Preset speeds only; Touchscreen; Variable speed (continuous); Other
ja: 電動糸車速度制御タイプ: アプリ制御; デジタルボタン; フットペダル; ハンドダイヤル/ノブ; レバー/スライダー; プリセット速度のみ; タッチスクリーン; 可変速度 (無段階); その他
sv: Elektrisk hastighetskontroll av spinnhjul: Appstyrd; Digitala knappar; Fotpedal; Handratt/ratt; Spak/reglage; Endast förinställda hastigheter; Pekskärm; Variabel hastighet (kontinuerlig); Övrigt
lt-LT: Elektrinio verpimo ratelio greičio valdymo tipas: Valdoma programėle; Skaitmeniniai mygtukai; Kojinis pedalas; Rankinis ratukas / rankenėlė; Svirtis / slankiklis; Tik iš anksto nustatyti greičiai; Jutiklinis ekranas; Kintamas greitis (nuolatinis); Kita
zh-CN: 电动纺车调速方式: 应用控制; 数字按钮; 脚踏板; 手摇盘/旋钮; 控制杆/滑块; 仅预设速度; 触摸屏; 变速（连续）; 其他
zh-TW: 電動紡車速度控制類型: App 控制; 數位按鈕; 腳踏板; 手動轉盤/旋鈕; 控制桿/滑桿; 僅限預設速度; 觸控螢幕; 變速 (無段); 其他
ru: Тип управления скоростью электрического прялочного колеса: Управление через приложение; Цифровые кнопки; Ножная педаль; Ручной регулятор/ручка; Рычаг/ползунок; Только предустановленные скорости; Сенсорный экран; Плавная регулировка скорости; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta električne kontrole brzine kotača za predenje: Upravljanje aplikacijom; Digitalni gumbi; Nožna papučica; Ručni kotačić / gumb; Poluga/klizač; Samo zadane brzine; Dodirni zaslon; Promjenjiva brzina (kontinuirana); Ostalo
pt-PT: tipo de controlo de velocidade da roda de fiar elétrica: Controlado por app; Botões digitais; Pedal; Seletor manual/botão; Alavanca/controlo de deslize; Apenas velocidades predefinidas; Ecrã tátil; Velocidade variável (contínua); Outro
vi: Loại điều khiển tốc độ bánh xe quay điện: Điều khiển qua ứng dụng; Nút kỹ thuật số; Bàn đạp; Đĩa quay/nút vặn tay; Cần gạt/thanh trượt; Chỉ tốc độ cài đặt sẵn; Màn hình cảm ứng; Tốc độ biến thiên (liên tục); Khác
cs: Regulace otáček elektrického kolovrátku: Ovládáno aplikací; Digitální tlačítka; Nožní pedál; Ruční otočný volič / knoflík; Páčka / posuvník; Pouze přednastavené rychlosti; Dotyková obrazovka; Proměnná rychlost (plynulá); Jiné
th: ประเภทการควบคุมความเร็วของวงล้อปั่นไฟฟ้า: ควบคุมด้วยแอป; ปุ่มดิจิทัล; เท้าเหยียบ; แป้นหมุน/ลูกบิด; คันโยก/สไลเดอร์; ความเร็วที่ตั้งไว้ล่วงหน้าเท่านั้น; หน้าจอสัมผัส; ความเร็วแบบปรับได้ (ต่อเนื่อง); อื่นๆ
pl: Typ regulacji prędkości elektrycznego kołowrotka przędzalniczego: Sterowane z aplikacji; Cyfrowe przyciski; Pedał nożny; Ręczne pokrętło/gałka; Dźwignia/suwak; Tylko zaprogramowane prędkości; Ekran dotykowy; Zmienna prędkość (płynna); Inne
ko: 전기 물레 속도 조절형: 앱 제어식; 디지털 버튼; 풋 페달; 핸드 다이얼/손잡이; 레버/슬라이더; 사전 설정 속도만; 터치스크린; 가변 속도(연속); 기타